Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202526-106
Petition; filing; proceeding; withdrawal, court order required.

(1) A petition for a protection order shall be filed with the clerk of the district court, and the proceeding may be heard by the county court or the district court as provided in section 25-2740.

(2) A petition for a protection order may not be withdrawn except upon order of the court.

Laws 2025, LB80, § 6.